Washington statutes.
RCW 7.84.030

Notice of infraction—Issuance—Authorization for detention for a reasonable period—Service—Filing.

(1) An infraction proceeding is initiated by the issuance and service of a printed notice of infraction and filing of a printed or electronic copy of the notice of infraction.

(2)(a) A notice of infraction may be issued by a person authorized to enforce the provisions of the title or chapter in which the infraction is established, or by a person authorized by an interlocal agreement entered into under RCW 7.84.140, when the infraction occurs in that person's presence.

(b) A person who is a peace officer as defined in chapter 10.93 RCW may detain the person receiving the infraction for a reasonable period of time necessary to identify the person, check for outstanding warrants, and complete and issue a notice of infraction under RCW 7.84.050. A person who is to receive a notice of infraction is required to identify himself or herself to the peace officer by giving the person's name, address, and date of birth. Upon request, the person shall produce reasonable identification, which may include a driver's license or identicard. Any person who fails to comply with the requirement to identify himself or herself and give the person's current address may be found to have committed an infraction.

(3) A court may issue a notice of infraction if a person authorized to enforce the provisions of the title or chapter in which the infraction is established, or by a person authorized by an interlocal agreement entered into under RCW 7.84.140, files with the court a written statement that the infraction was committed in that person's presence or that the officer has reason to believe an infraction was committed.

(4) Service of a notice of infraction issued under subsection (2) or (3) of this section shall be as provided by court rule.

(5) A notice of infraction shall be filed with a court having jurisdiction within five days of issuance, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.

[ 2012 c 176 s 1; 2011 c 320 s 14; 2009 c 174 s 1; 2004 c 43 s 2; 1987 c 380 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 320: See note following RCW 79A.80.005.

Findings—Intent—2011 c 320: See RCW 79A.80.005.

Effective date—2004 c 43: See note following RCW 7.80.150.